Connecticut, session 2026, HB05091.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 17b of the general statutes be amended to (1) require an
undocumented resident to have (A) lived in the state for not less than
one year, and (B) applied for legal immigration status to be eligible for
medical assistance, and (2) increase HUSKY C asset limits to five
thousand dollars for an unmarried individual and seven thousand five
hundred dollars for a married couple.